District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1826

Reinstatement of expired license.

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245, § 27, 40 DCR 660
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1236, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 2-446.

Prior Codifications